Washington statutes.
RCW 38.56.040

Qualifications of emergency responders for the purposes of the requesting member jurisdiction.

An emergency responder holding a license, certificate, or other permit evidencing qualification in a professional, mechanical, or other skill, issued by the state of Washington or a political subdivision thereof, is deemed to be licensed, certified, or permitted in the requesting member jurisdiction for the duration of the emergency, drill, or exercise, subject to any limitations and conditions the chief executive officer of the requesting member jurisdiction may prescribe in writing.

[ 2011 c 79 s 4.]